Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Cooperatives.

§ 55.1-2112.
Creation of cooperative ownership.

A cooperative may be created pursuant to this chapter only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed and by conveying to the association the real estate subject to that declaration. The declaration shall be recorded in every county or city in which any portion of the cooperative is located, indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the cooperative and the association, and indexed in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the declaration.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-438; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2113.
Unit boundaries.

Except as otherwise provided by the declaration:

If walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, and finished flooring and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces of such walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements.

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or other fixture lies partially within and partially outside of the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion of such fixture serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion of such fixture serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision 2, all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit.

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, or patios and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the unit’s boundaries, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-439; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2114.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities shall not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

55.1-2133

.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent that the declaration is inconsistent with this chapter.

Title to a cooperative interest is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this chapter. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by this chapter.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-440; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2115.
Description of units.

A description of a unit that sets forth the name of the cooperative, the recording data for the declaration, the county or city in which the cooperative is located, and the identifying number of the unit is a legally sufficient description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit that were created by the declaration or bylaws.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-441; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2116.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration shall contain:

The name of the cooperative, which shall include the word “cooperative” or be followed by the words “a cooperative,” and the association;

The name of every county or city in which any part of the cooperative is situated;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the cooperative;

A statement of the maximum number of units that the declarant reserves the right to create;

A description, which may be by plats or plans, of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number, its size or number of rooms, and its location within a building if it is within a building containing more than one unit;

A description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in subdivisions 2 and 4 of §

55.1-2113

;

A description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, that may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in subdivisions 2 and 4 of §

55.1-2113

, together with a statement that they may be so allocated;

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant, together with a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of those rights applies, and a time limit within which each of those rights are required to be exercised;

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect together with (i) either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards and (ii) a statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of the real estate subject to that development right, that development right is required to be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate;

Any other conditions or limitations under which the rights described in subdivision 8 may be exercised or will lapse;

An allocation to each cooperative interest of the allocated interests in the manner described in §

55.1-2118

;

Any restrictions on (i) use and occupancy of the units, (ii) alienation of the cooperative interests, and (iii) the amount for which a cooperative interest may be sold or the amount that may be received by a proprietary lessee upon sale of, condemnation of, or casualty loss to the unit or the cooperative or termination of the cooperative;

The recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to, or included in, the cooperative or to which any portion of the cooperative is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration; and

All matters required by §§

55.1-2117

,

55.1-2118

,

55.1-2119

,

55.1-2125

, and

55.1-2126

and subsection D of §

55.1-2134

.

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant deems appropriate.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-442; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2117.
Leasehold cooperatives.

The expiration or termination of any lease that may terminate the cooperative or reduce its size, or a memorandum of such lease, shall be recorded. The declaration shall state:

The recording data for the lease or a statement of where the complete lease may be inspected;

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any right of the proprietary lessees to redeem the reversion and how those rights may be exercised, or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any right of the proprietary lessees to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that they do not have those rights; and

Any rights of the proprietary lessees to renew the lease and the conditions, if any, of any renewal, or a statement that they do not have those rights.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any proprietary lessee by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all proprietary lessees subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a cooperative, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with subsection A of §

55.1-2118

as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-443; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2118.
Allocation of ownership interests, votes, and common expense liabilities.

The declaration shall allocate an ownership interest in the association a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association and a portion of the votes in the association, or to each cooperative interest in the cooperative, and state the formulas used to establish those allocations. Those allocations shall not discriminate in favor of cooperative interests owned by the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the cooperative, the declaration shall state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all cooperative interests included in the cooperative after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide (i) that different allocations of votes shall be made to the cooperative interests on particular matters specified in the declaration, (ii) for cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board, and (iii) for class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class. No declarant shall utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this chapter, nor shall cooperative interests constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the common expense liabilities allocated at any time to all the cooperative interests must equal one if stated as a fraction or 100 percent if stated as a percentage. In the event of a discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the ownership interest in the association made without the possessory interest in the unit to which that interest is related is void.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-444; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2119.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in subdivisions 2 and 4 of §

55.1-2113

, the declaration shall specify to which of the units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the consent of the proprietary lessees whose units are affected.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the proprietary lessees between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy to the association, which shall record it. The amendment shall be recorded in the names of the parties and the cooperative.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element shall not be so allocated except pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with subdivision A 7 of §

55.1-2116

. The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-445; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2120.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under subdivision A 8 of §

55.1-2116

, the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration as specified in §

55.1-2127

. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection B, reallocate the allocated interests among all cooperative interests. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements created by such amendment and, in the case of limited common elements, designate to which of the units each is allocated to the extent required by §

55.1-2119

.

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the cooperative if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by §

55.1-2116

or

55.1-2117

, as appropriate. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to subdivision A 8 of §

55.1-2116

.

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the cooperative interest of which that unit is a part among the other cooperative interests as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain.

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the cooperative interest of which that unit is a part among the cooperative interests created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides, pursuant to subdivision A 8 of §

55.1-2116

, that all of or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a cooperative interest has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be withdrawn after a cooperative interest in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-446; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2121.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a proprietary lessee:

May make any improvements or alterations to his unit that do not impair the structural integrity or the electrical or mechanical systems of any portion of the cooperative;

Shall not change the appearance of the common elements, or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the cooperative, other than the interior of the unit, without permission of the association;

After acquiring a cooperative interest of which an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit is a part, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity or electrical or mechanical systems of any portion of the cooperative. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this subdivision is not an alteration of boundaries.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-447; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2122.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the proprietary lessees of those units. If the proprietary lessees of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their cooperative interests of their allocated interests, the application shall state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines within 30 days that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those proprietary lessees, contains words of conveyance between them, and upon recordation is indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee.

The association shall prepare and record amendments to the declaration, including any plans necessary to show or describe the altered boundaries between adjoining units and their sizes and identifying numbers. All costs for such preparation and recordation shall be borne by the proprietary lessees involved.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-448; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2123.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two or more units. Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, upon application of a proprietary lessee to subdivide a unit, the association shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration subdividing that unit. All costs for such preparation, execution, and recordation shall be borne by the proprietary lessees involved.

The amendment to the declaration must (i) be executed by the proprietary lessee of the unit to be subdivided, (ii) assign an identifying number to each unit created, and (iii) reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the cooperative interest of which the subdivided unit is a part to the new cooperative interests in any reasonable manner prescribed by the proprietary lessee of the cooperative interest of which the subdivided unit is a part.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-449; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2124.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a proprietary lessee of liability in case of his willful misconduct or relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to any representation in the public offering statement.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-450; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2125.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in units or on common elements in the cooperative only if the declaration so provides and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to the number, size, location, and relocation of such offices or models. Any sales office, management office, or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element, and if a declarant ceases to have an ownership interest in the association, he ceases to have any rights with regard to such offices or models, unless it is removed promptly from the cooperative in accordance with a right to remove reserved in the declaration. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the cooperative. The provisions of this section are subject to the provisions of other state law and to local ordinances.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-451; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2126.
Easement rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under this chapter or reserved in the declaration.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-452; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2127.
Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under §

55.1-2120

, the association under §

55.1-2105

, subsection C of §

55.1-2117

, subsection C of §

55.1-2119

, subsection A of §

55.1-2122

, or §

55.1-2123

, or certain proprietary lessees under subsection B of §

55.1-2119

, subsection A of §

55.1-2122

, subsection B of §

55.1-2123

, or subsection B of §

55.1-2128

and except as limited by subsection D, the declaration may be amended only by vote or agreement of proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which at least two-thirds of the votes in the association are allocated, or a larger percentage if the declaration so specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

No action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration must be recorded in every county or city in which any portion of the cooperative is located and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment shall be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the cooperative and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

The declaration may be amended to extend the time limit within which special declarant rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to subdivision A 8 of §

55.1-2116

may be exercised only by vote or agreement of proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which at least twothirds of the votes in the association are allocated to cooperative interests not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by this subsection or other provisions of this chapter, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, or change the boundaries of any unit, the allocated interests of a cooperative interest, or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the proprietary lessees.

If the time limit specified in the declaration for the creation of cooperative interests or the exercise of special declarant rights has expired, with the approval of the persons entitled to cast at least two-thirds of the votes in the association, other than any votes allocated to cooperative interests owned by the declarant, or any larger percentage as the declaration specifies, the declaration may be amended to (i) revive and reinstate any or all of the expired rights to create additional cooperative interests and any or all of the expired special declarant rights and (ii) vest in any person, including the original declarant, any or all of the powers, rights, privileges, and authority to which a declarant is entitled under this chapter regarding the exercise of the revived and reinstated rights with respect to any parcel of real estate that is a common element or any additional real estate that such amendment permits to be added to the cooperative. In no event, however, shall any such amendment extend or renew a period of declarant control of the association or provide a new period of declarant control.

Amendments to the declaration required by this chapter to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of such designation, by the president of the association.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-453; 2008, c. 628; 2009, c. 221; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2128.
Termination of cooperative ownership.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain, or in the case of foreclosure of a security interest against the entire cooperative that has priority over the declaration, cooperative ownership may be terminated only by agreement of proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which at least four-fifths of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the cooperative are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate must be evidenced by the execution of a termination agreement or ratification of such agreement in the same manner as a deed by the requisite number of proprietary lessees. The termination agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all such ratifications must be recorded in every county or city in which a portion of the cooperative is situated and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the proprietary lessees, may contract for the sale of real estate in the cooperative, but the contract is not binding until approved pursuant to subsections A and B. After such approval, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded, and the proceeds of such sale are distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Except to the extent that any provisions in the declaration limit the amount that may be received by a proprietary lessee upon termination, as set forth in subdivision A 12 of §

55.1-2116

, proceeds of the sale must be distributed to holders of liens against the association and against the cooperative interests and to proprietary lessees, all as their interests may appear, in accordance with subsections D and E. Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each proprietary lessee and his successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his unit. During the period of such occupancy, each proprietary lessee and his successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on proprietary lessees by this chapter or the declaration.

Following termination of the cooperative, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for proprietary lessees and holders of liens against the association and the cooperative interests, as their interests may appear. The declaration may provide that all creditors of the association have priority over any interests of proprietary lessees and creditors of proprietary lessees. Where the declaration provides such a priority, following termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the cooperative that were recorded or docketed before termination may enforce their liens in the same manner as any lienholder, and all other creditors of the association are to be treated as if they had perfected liens against the cooperative immediately before termination. Unless the declaration provides that all creditors of the association have such priority:

The lien of each creditor of the association that was perfected against the association before termination becomes a lien against each cooperative interest upon termination as of the date the lien was perfected;

All other creditors of the association are to be treated as if they had perfected liens against the cooperative interests immediately before termination;

The amounts of the liens of the association’s creditors described in subdivisions 1 and 2 against each of the cooperative interests must be proportionate to the ratio that that cooperative interest’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liability of all the cooperative interests;

The lien of each creditor of each proprietary lessee that was perfected before termination continues as a lien against that proprietary lessee’s cooperative interest as of the date the lien was perfected; and

The assets of the association shall be distributed to all proprietary lessees and all lienholders against their cooperative interests as their interests may appear in the order described in subdivisions 1 through 4, and creditors of the association are not entitled to payment from any proprietary lessee in excess of the amount of the creditor’s lien against that proprietary lessee’s cooperative interest.

The respective interests of proprietary lessees referred to in subsections C and D are as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision 2, the respective interests of proprietary lessees are the fair market values of their cooperative interests immediately before the termination, as determined by one or more independent appraisers selected by the association. Appraisers selected shall hold a designation awarded by a major, nationwide testing or certifying professional appraisal society or association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the proprietary lessees and becomes final unless disapproved within 30 days after distribution by proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which 25 percent of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any proprietary lessee’s interest to that of all proprietary lessees is determined by dividing the fair market value of that proprietary lessee’s cooperative interest by the total fair market values of all the cooperative interests.

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value of the unit or limited common element before destruction cannot be made, the interests of all proprietary lessees are their respective ownership interests in the association immediately before the termination.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-454; 1983, c. 96; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2129.
Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the lenders holding security interests encumbering the cooperative interests approve specified actions of the proprietary lessees or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but no requirement for approval shall operate to (i) deny or delegate control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the proprietary lessees or the executive board; (ii) prevent the association or the executive board from commencing, intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceeding; or (iii) receive and distribute any insurance proceeds except pursuant to §

55.1-2145

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-455; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2130.
Master associations.

If the declaration provides that any of the powers described in §

55.1-2134

are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a for-profit or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association that exercises those or other powers on behalf of one or more cooperatives or for the benefit of the proprietary lessees of one or more cooperatives, all provisions of this chapter applicable to associations apply to any such corporation or unincorporated association, except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in §

55.1-2132

, it may exercise the powers set forth in subdivision A 2 of §

55.1-2133

only to the extent expressly permitted in the declarations of the cooperatives that are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations of power from those cooperatives to the master association.

If the declaration of any cooperative provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to the delegated powers.

The rights and responsibilities of proprietary lessees with respect to the association set forth in §§

55.1-2134

,

55.1-2140

,

55.1-2141

,

55.1-2142

, and

55.1-2144

apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise proprietary lessees within the meaning of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection F of §

55.1-2134

, with respect to the election of the executive board of an association by all proprietary lessees after the period of declarant control ends, and even if a master association is also an association as described in §

55.1-2132

, the certificate of incorporation or other instrument creating the master association and the declaration of each cooperative, the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association, may provide that the executive board of the master association must be elected after the period of declarant control in any of the following ways:

All proprietary lessees of all cooperatives subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All members of the executive boards of all cooperatives subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All proprietary lessees of each cooperative subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

All proprietary lessees of the executive board of each cooperative subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-456; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2131.
Merger or consolidation of cooperatives.

Any two or more cooperatives, by agreement of the proprietary lessees as provided in subsection B, may be merged or consolidated into a single cooperative. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant cooperative is, for all purposes, the legal successor of all of the preexisting cooperatives. The operations and activities of all associations of the preexisting cooperatives shall be merged or consolidated into a single association, which shall hold all powers, rights, obligations, assets, and liabilities of all preexisting associations.

An agreement of two or more cooperatives to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection A must be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded, and certified by the president of the association of each of the preexisting cooperatives following approval by proprietary lessees of cooperative interests to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each cooperative required to terminate that cooperative. Any such agreement must be recorded in every county or city in which a portion of the cooperative is located and is not effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement must provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the cooperative interests of the resultant cooperative either (i) by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based or (ii) by stating the percentage of overall allocated interest of the new cooperative that are allocated to all of the cooperative interests comprising each of the preexisting cooperatives and providing that the portion of the percentages allocated to each cooperative interest formerly comprising a part of the preexisting cooperative must be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that cooperative interest by the declaration of the preexisting cooperative.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-457; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.